Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6547
Additional definitions.

Any term defined in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 or in the ImagiNE Nebraska Act has the same meaning in the Grow the Good Life Act unless the context or the express language of the Grow the Good Life Act requires a different meaning.

Laws 2026, LB1165, § 4.
April 17, 2026
ImagiNE Nebraska Act, see section 77-6801.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.